Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STEARNS COUNTY STATE-AID HIGHWAY 47; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,620,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the construction of acceleration lanes, right turn lanes, and right turn buffers in each direction of marked Trunk Highway 23 at the intersection of Stearns County State-Aid Highway 47, including preliminary and final design, construction engineering services, and all construction and associated project costs. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin STEARNS COUNTY ROAD 140 AND STEARNS COUNTY STATE-AID HIGHWAY 82; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,620,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the construction of acceleration lanes, right turn lanes, and right turn buffers in each direction of marked Trunk Highway 23 at the intersection of Stearns County Road 140 and Stearns County State-Aid Highway 82, including preliminary and final design, construction engineering services, and all construction and associated project costs. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end